District of Columbia statutes.
8-1319

Repealed

Establishment of a Hazardous Waste and Toxic Chemical Release Source Reduction Fund and fee.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-64, § 21
as added Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-229, title I, § 102(c), 38 DCR 246
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 15(b), 40 DCR 6311
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9091, 58 DCR 6226
1981 Ed., § 6-735.